Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.085

Inactive licenses—Renewal—Application of disciplinary provisions.

The commission may adopt rules pursuant to this section authorizing an inactive license status.

(1) An individual licensed pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license shall not practice medicine and surgery in this state without first activating the license.

(2) The administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fee for inactive renewal shall be established pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(3) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon compliance with rules established by the commission.

(4) Provisions relating to disciplinary action against a person with a license shall be applicable to a person with an inactive license, except that when disciplinary proceedings against a person with an inactive license have been initiated, the license shall remain inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

[ 1996 c 191 s 53; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 313; 1991 c 44 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.